Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4888.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. This act does not apply to any of the following: (a) A person employed exclusively and regularly by an employer in connection with the affairs of the employer only , if there exists a bona fide employer-employee relationship for which the employee is reimbursed on a salary basis. (b) An officer or employee of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state while that officer or employee is engaged in the performance of his or her the official duties of the officer or employee except that such an officer or employee does not include a professional investigator hired or employed under contract by the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state. (c) The business of obtaining and furnishing information as to the financial standing, rating, and credit responsibility of persons or as to the personal habits and financial responsibility of applicants for insurance, indemnity bonds, or commercial credit. (d) A charitable philanthropic society or association duly incorporated under the laws of this state that is organized and maintained for the public good and not for private profit. (e) An attorney admitted to practice in this state in performing his or her the attorney's duties as an attorney at law. (f) A collection agency or finance company licensed to do business under the laws of this state, a collection agency, or any employee of a collection agency or finance company while acting within the scope of his or her the employee's employment when making an investigation incidental to the business of the agency, including an investigation of the location of the debtor or his or her the debtor's assets and property in which the client has an interest or upon on which the client has a lien. (g) An insurance adjuster who is employed on a salary basis by an insurance company or a person, firm, partnership, company, limited liability company, or corporation that acts for an insurance company solely in the capacity of claim adjuster. (h) A person, firm, partnership, company, limited liability company, or corporation that is engaged in the business of public adjuster acting for claimants in securing adjustments of claims against insurance companies and who that does not perform investigative services, including, but not limited to, surveillance activities. (i) A professional engineer acting within the scope of his or her the professional engineer's licensed professional practice who does not perform investigative services, including, but not limited to, surveillance activities or other activities outside of the scope of his or her the professional engineer's licensed professional practice. (j) A certified public accountant currently licensed, registered, or certified by a regulatory agency of this state or any other state or a public accounting firm currently licensed, registered, or certified by a regulatory agency of this state or any other state, including the employees of the certified public accountant or public accounting firm acting within the scope of the individual's or the public accounting firm's professional practice. (k) A bail agent authorized under section 167b of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.167b, while performing his or her the bail agent's duties as a bail agent. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4887 (request no. H02604'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.